Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Chapter 15

Tennessee Tollway Authority [Repealed]

54-15-101 — 54-15-125. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former Chapter 15, §§ 54-15-101 — 54-15-125 (Acts 1975, ch. 372, §§ 1-25; T.C.A., §§ 54-2701 — 54-2725; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6, 113; 1995, ch. 305, § 107; 1996, ch. 622, § 3), concerning the Tennessee tollway authority, was repealed by Acts 2002, ch. 796, effective July 1, 2002.